Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2410
Degree or advanced degree in health care, defined.

Degree or advanced degree in health care means a baccalaureate, master's, or doctorate degree from an accredited institution in health care, health care administration, or services.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 825.